test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-baeqzmwr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - bäʼzmõr: # Noun 238 'eng /est päsmer/fin' - full paradigm
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Nom: [bäʼzmõr, bäzmõr]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Gen: [bäʼzmõr, bäzmõr]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Par: [bäʼzmõrt, bäzmõrt]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Dat: [bäʼzmõrõn, bäzmõrõn]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ins: [bäʼzmõrõks, bäzmõrõks]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ill: [bäʼzmõrõ, bäzmõrõ]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ela: [bäʼzmõrõst, bäzmõrõst]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Nom: [bäʼzmõrd, bäzmõrd]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Gen: [bäʼzmõrd, bäzmõrd]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Par: [bäʼzmõri, bäzmõri]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Dat: [bäʼzmõrdõn, bäzmõrdõn]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ins: [bäʼzmõrdõks, bäzmõrdõks]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ill: [bäʼzmõriž, bäzmõriž]
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ela: [bäʼzmõrist, bäzmõrist]
